Washington statutes.
RCW 11.08.250

Order of court on establishment of claim—Parklands—Appraisal.

Upon establishment of the claim to the satisfaction of the court, it shall order payment to the claimant of any escheated funds and delivery of any escheated land, or the proceeds thereof, if sold. If, however, the escheated property shall have been transferred to the state parks and recreation commission or local jurisdiction for park purposes, the court shall order payment to the claimant for the fair market value of the property at the time of transfer, excluding the value of physical improvements to the property while managed by a state agency or local jurisdiction. The value shall be established by independent appraisal obtained by the department of revenue.

[ 1993 c 49 s 2; 1965 c 145 s 11.08.250. Prior: 1955 c 254 s 13.]

NOTES:

Parkland: RCW 79.10.030.